Maine, session 132, LD1381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §33, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 473, §2 and affected by §46, is
amended to read:
§33. Prosecution Investigation and prosecution of violations
The Secretary of State shall designate sworn law enforcement officers employed by the
Department of the Secretary of State to investigate alleged violations of the election laws.
The Attorney General shall designate a Deputy Attorney General or an Assistant Attorney
General to investigate assist in the investigation of and to prosecute alleged violations of
the election laws. This section does not preclude a district attorney from investigating and
prosecuting election law violations.